Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0776.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2. (1) As used in this act: (a) "Person" means an individual, firm, partnership, joint venture, association, social club, fraternal organization, municipal or private corporation whether or not organized for profit, company, limited liability company, estate, trust, receiver, trustee, syndicate, the United States, this state, county, or any other group or combination acting as a unit, and includes the plural as well as the singular number, unless the intention to give a more limited meaning is disclosed by the context. (b) "Use" means the exercise of a right or power over tangible personal property incident to the ownership of that property including transfer of the property in a transaction where possession is given. Converting tangible personal property acquired for a use exempt from the tax levied under this act to a use not exempt from the tax levied under this act is a taxable use. (c) "Storage" means a keeping or retention of property in this state for any purpose after the property loses its interstate character. (d) "Seller" means the person from whom a purchase is made and includes every person selling tangible personal property or services for storage, use, or other consumption in this state. If, in the opinion of the department, it is necessary for the efficient administration of this act to regard a salesperson, representative, peddler, or canvasser as the agent of a dealer, distributor, supervisor, or employer under whom the person operates or from whom the person obtains tangible personal property or services sold by the person for storage, use, or other consumption in this state, irrespective of whether or not the person is making the sales on the person's own behalf or on behalf of the dealer, distributor, supervisor, or employer, the department may so consider the person, and may consider the dealer, distributor, supervisor, or employer as the seller for the purpose of this act. (e) "Purchase" means to acquire for a consideration, whether the acquisition is effected by a transfer of title, of possession, or of both, or a license to use or consume; whether the transfer is absolute or conditional, and by whatever means the transfer is effected; and whether consideration is a price or rental in money, or by way of exchange or barter. Purchase includes converting tangible personal property acquired for a use exempt from the tax levied under this act to a use not exempt from the tax levied under this act. (f) "Purchase price" or "price" means the total amount of consideration paid by the consumer to the seller, including cash, credit, property, and services, for which tangible personal property or services are sold, leased, or rented, valued in money, whether received in money or otherwise, and applies to the measure subject to use tax. Purchase price includes the following subparagraphs (i) to (vii) and excludes subparagraphs (viii) to (xv): (i) Seller's cost of the property sold. (ii) Cost of materials used, labor or service cost, interest, losses, costs of transportation to the seller, taxes imposed on the seller other than taxes imposed by this act, and any other expense of the seller. (iii) Charges by the seller for any services necessary to complete the sale, other than the following: (A) An amount received or billed by the taxpayer for remittance to the employee as a gratuity or tip, if the gratuity or tip is separately identified and itemized on the guest check or billed to the customer. (B) Labor or service charges involved in maintenance and repair work on tangible personal property of others if separately itemized. (iv) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (xv), delivery charges. A seller is not liable under this act for delivery charges allocated to the delivery of exempt property. (v) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (xv), installation charges. (vi) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraphs (xi), (xii), and (xiv), credit for any trade-in. (vii) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (x), consideration received by the seller from third parties if all of the following conditions are met: (A) The seller actually receives consideration from a party other than the purchaser and the consideration is directly related to a price reduction or discount on the sale. (B) The seller has an obligation to pass the price reduction or discount through to the purchaser. (C) The amount of the consideration attributable to the sale is fixed and determinable by the seller at the time of the sale of the item to the purchaser. (D) One of the following criteria is met: (I) The purchaser presents a coupon, certificate, or other documentation to the seller to claim a price reduction or discount where the coupon, certificate, or documentation is authorized, distributed, or granted by a third party with the understanding that the third party will reimburse any seller to whom the coupon, certificate, or documentation is presented. (II) The purchaser identifies himself or herself to the seller as a member of a group or organization entitled to a price reduction or discount. A preferred customer card that is available to any patron does not constitute membership in a group or organization. (III) The price reduction or discount is identified as a third party price reduction or discount on the invoice received by the purchaser or on a coupon, certificate, or other documentation presented by the purchaser. (viii) Interest, financing, or carrying charges from credit extended on the sale of personal property or services, if the amount is separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document given to the purchaser. (ix) Any taxes legally imposed directly on the consumer that are separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document given to the purchaser. (x) Beginning January 1, 2000, employee discounts that are reimbursed by a third party on sales of motor vehicles. (xi) Beginning November 15, 2013, credit for the agreed-upon value of a titled or documented watercraft used as part payment of the purchase price of a new titled or documented watercraft or used titled or documented watercraft purchased from a watercraft dealer if the agreed-upon value is separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document given to the purchaser. This subparagraph does not apply to leases or rentals. As used in this subparagraph, "documented" means a watercraft that is documented through the United States Coast Guard. (xii) Beginning December 15, 2013, credit for the agreed-upon value of a motor vehicle or recreational vehicle used as part payment of the purchase price of a new motor vehicle or used motor vehicle or recreational vehicle purchased from a dealer if the agreed-upon value is separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document given to the purchaser. This subparagraph does not apply to leases or rentals. Except as otherwise provided under subparagraph (xiv), for purposes of this subparagraph, the agreed-upon value of a motor vehicle or recreational vehicle used as part payment is limited as follows: (A) Beginning December 15, 2013, subject to sub-subparagraphs (B) and (C), the lesser of the following: (I) $2,000.00. (II) The agreed-upon value of the motor vehicle or recreational vehicle used as part payment. (B) Beginning January 1, 2015 and each January 1 thereafter through December 31, 2018, the amount under sub-subparagraph (A)(I) is increased by an additional $500.00 each year. (C) Beginning January 1, 2019, subject to sub-subparagraphs (D) and (E), the lesser of the following: (I) $5,000.00. (II) The agreed-upon value of the motor vehicle used as part payment. (D) Beginning January 1, 2020 and each January 1 thereafter, the amount under sub-subparagraph (C)(I) is increased by an additional $1,000.00 each year. (E) Beginning on January 1, in the year in which the amount under sub-subparagraph (C)(I) exceeds $14,000.00 and each January 1 thereafter, there is no limitation on the agreed-upon value of the motor vehicle used as part payment. (xiii) Beginning January 1, 2017, credit for the core charge attributable to a recycling fee, deposit, or disposal fee for a motor vehicle or recreational vehicle part or battery if the recycling fee, deposit, or disposal fee is separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document given to the purchaser. (xiv) Beginning January 1, 2018, credit for the agreed-upon value of a recreational vehicle used as part payment of the purchase price of a recreational vehicle purchased from a dealer if the agreed-upon value is separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document given to the purchaser. This subparagraph does not apply to leases or rentals. (xv) Delivery or installation charges if such charges are separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document provided to the purchaser, and the taxpayer maintains its books and records to show separately the transactions used to determine the tax levied by this act. This subdivision does not apply to delivery or installation charges involving or relating to the sale of electricity, natural gas, or artificial gas by a utility. (g) "Consumer" means the person who has purchased tangible personal property or services for storage, use, or other consumption in this state and includes, but is not limited to, 1 or more of the following: (i) A person acquiring tangible personal property if engaged in the business of constructing, altering, repairing, or improving the real estate of others. (ii) A person who has converted tangible personal property or services acquired for storage, use, or consumption in this state that is exempt from the tax levied under this act to storage, use, or consumption in this state that is not exempt from the tax levied under this act. (h) "Business" means all activities engaged in by a person or caused to be engaged in by a person with the object of gain, benefit, or advantage, either direct or indirect. (i) "Department" means the department of treasury. (j) "Tax" includes all taxes, interest, or penalties levied under this act. (k) "Tangible personal property" means personal property that can be seen, weighed, measured, felt, or touched or that is in any other manner perceptible to the senses and includes electricity, water, gas, steam, and prewritten computer software. (l) "Textiles" means goods that are made of or incorporate woven or nonwoven fabric, including, but not limited to, clothing, shoes, hats, gloves, handkerchiefs, curtains, towels, sheets, pillows, pillowcases, tablecloths, napkins, aprons, linens, floor mops, floor mats, and thread. Textiles also include materials used to repair or construct textiles, or other goods used in the rental, sale, or cleaning of textiles. (m) "Interstate motor carrier" means a person who operates or causes to be operated a qualified commercial motor vehicle on a public road or highway in this state and at least 1 other state or Canadian province. (n) "Qualified commercial motor vehicle" means that term as defined in section 1(l), (m), and (n) of the motor carrier fuel tax act, 1980 PA 119, MCL 207.211. (o) "Diesel fuel" means that term as defined in section 2(q) of the motor fuel tax act, 2000 PA 403, MCL 207.1002. (p) "Sale" means a transaction by which tangible personal property or services are purchased or rented for storage, use, or other consumption in this state. (q) "Convert" means putting a service or tangible personal property acquired for a use exempt from the tax levied under this act at the time of acquisition to a use that is not exempt from the tax levied under this act, whether the use is in whole or in part, or permanent or not permanent. A motor vehicle purchased for resale by a new vehicle dealer licensed under section 248(8)(a) of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.248, and not registered in the name of the dealer is not considered to be converted before sale or lease by that dealer. (r) "New motor vehicle" means that term as defined in section 33a of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.33a. (s) "Recreational vehicle" means that term as defined in section 49a of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.49a. (t) "Dealer" means that term as defined in section 11 of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.11. (u) "Watercraft dealer" means a dealer as that term is defined in section 80102 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.80102. (v) "Utility" means either of the following: (i) A person regulated by the Michigan public service commission as a utility. (ii) A person that operates equipment or facilities for producing, generating, transmitting, delivering, or furnishing electricity within this state for the public for compensation, regardless of the person's owner, ownership structure, or regulation by the Michigan public service commission. (2) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this act, the following applies only to delivery and installation charges described in subsection (1)(f)(iv) or (v), except that this subsection does not apply to delivery and installation charges involving or relating to the sale of electricity, natural gas, or artificial gas by a utility: (a) Not later than July 25, 2023, the department shall cancel all outstanding balances related to such delivery and installation charges on notices of intent to assess that were issued under section 21 of 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.21, for the tax levied under this act and that were issued before April 26, 2023. (b) Not later than July 25, 2023, the department shall cancel all outstanding balances related to such delivery and installation charges on final assessments that were issued under section 22 of 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.22, for the tax levied under this act, and that were issued before April 26, 2023. (c) Beginning April 26, 2023, the department shall not issue any new assessments for the tax levied under this act on such delivery and installation charges for any tax period before April 26, 2023, that is open under the statute of limitations provided in section 27a of 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.27a. Sec. 4. (1) The following are exempt from the tax levied under this act, subject to subsection (2): (a) Property sold in this state on which transaction a tax is paid under the general sales tax act, 1933 PA 167, MCL 205.51 to 205.78, if the tax was due and paid on the retail sale to a consumer. (b) Property, the storage, use, or other consumption of which this state is prohibited from taxing under the Constitution or laws of the United States, or under the constitution of this state. (c) All of the following: (i) Property purchased for resale. Property purchased for resale includes promotional merchandise transferred pursuant to a redemption offer to a person located outside this state or any packaging material, other than promotional merchandise, acquired for use in fulfilling a redemption offer or rebate to a person located outside this state. (ii) Property purchased for lending or leasing to a public or parochial school offering a course in automobile driving except that a vehicle purchased by the school must be certified for driving education and must not be reassigned for personal use by the school's administrative personnel. (iii) Property purchased for demonstration purposes. For a new vehicle dealer selling a new car or truck, exemption for demonstration purposes is determined by the number of new cars and trucks sold during the current calendar year or the immediately preceding calendar year, without regard to specific make or style, according to the following schedule but not to exceed 25 cars and trucks in 1 calendar year for demonstration purposes: (A) 0 to 25, 2 units. (B) 26 to 100, 7 units. (C) 101 to 500, 20 units. (D) 501 or more, 25 units. (iv) Motor vehicles purchased for resale purposes by a new vehicle dealer licensed under section 248(8)(a) of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.248. (d) Property that is brought into this state by a nonresident person for storage, use, or consumption while temporarily within this state, except if the property is used in this state in a nontransitory business activity for a period exceeding 15 days. (e) Property the sale or use of which was already subjected to a sales tax or use tax equal to, or in excess of, that imposed by this act under the law of any other state or a local governmental unit within a state if the tax was due and paid on the retail sale to the consumer and the state or local governmental unit within a state in which the tax was imposed accords like or complete exemption on property the sale or use of which was subjected to the sales or use tax of this state. If the sale or use of property was already subjected to a tax under the law of any other state or local governmental unit within a state in an amount less than the tax imposed by this act, this act applies, but at a rate measured by the difference between the rate provided in this act and the rate by which the previous tax was computed. (f) Except as otherwise provided under subsection (3), property sold to a person engaged in a business enterprise that uses or consumes the property, directly or indirectly, for either the tilling, planting, draining, caring for, maintaining, or harvesting of things of the soil or the breeding, raising, or caring for livestock, poultry, or horticultural products, including the transfers of livestock, poultry, or horticultural products for further growth. (g) Property or services sold to the United States, an unincorporated agency or instrumentality of the United States, an incorporated agency or instrumentality of the United States wholly owned by the United States or by a corporation wholly owned by the United States, the American Red Cross and its chapters or branches, this state, a department or institution of this state, or a political subdivision of this state. (h) Property or services sold to a school, hospital, or home for the care and maintenance of children or aged individuals, operated by an entity of government, a regularly organized church, religious organization, or fraternal organization, a veterans' organization, or a corporation incorporated under the laws of this state, if not operated for profit, and if the income or benefit from the operation does not inure, in whole or in part, to an individual or private shareholder, directly or indirectly, and if the activities of the entity or agency are carried on exclusively for the benefit of the public at large and are not limited to the advantage, interests, and benefits of its members or a restricted group. The tax levied does not apply to property or services sold to a parent cooperative preschool. As used in this subdivision, "parent cooperative preschool" means a nonprofit, nondiscriminatory educational institution, maintained as a community service and administered by parents of children currently enrolled in the preschool that provides an educational and developmental program for children younger than compulsory school age, that provides an educational program for parents, including active participation with children in preschool activities, that is directed by qualified preschool personnel, and that is licensed under 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111 to 722.128. (i) Property or services sold to a regularly organized church or house of religious worship except the following: (i) Sales in which the property is used in activities that are mainly commercial enterprises. (ii) Sales of vehicles licensed for use on the public highways other than a passenger van or bus with a manufacturer's rated seating capacity of 10 or more that is used primarily for the transportation of individuals for religious purposes. (j) A vessel designed for commercial use of registered tonnage of 500 tons or more, if produced upon special order of the purchaser, and bunker and galley fuel, provisions, supplies, maintenance, and repairs for the exclusive use of a vessel of 500 tons or more engaged in interstate commerce. (k) Property purchased for use in this state if actual personal possession is obtained outside this state, the purchase price or actual value of which does not exceed $10.00 during 1 calendar month. (l) A newspaper or periodical classified under federal postal laws and regulations effective September 1, 1985 as second-class mail matter or as a controlled circulation publication or qualified to accept legal notices for publication in this state, as defined by law, or any other newspaper or periodical of general circulation, established not less than 2 years, and published at least once a week, and a copyrighted motion picture film. Tangible personal property used or consumed in producing a copyrighted motion picture film, a newspaper published more than 14 times per year, or a periodical published more than 14 times per year, and not becoming a component part of that film, newspaper, or periodical is subject to the tax. Tangible personal property used or consumed in producing a newspaper published 14 times or less per year or a periodical published 14 times or less per year and that portion or percentage of tangible personal property used or consumed in producing an advertising supplement that becomes a component part of a newspaper or periodical is exempt from the tax under this subdivision. For purposes of this subdivision, tangible personal property that becomes a component part of a newspaper or periodical and consequently not subject to tax, includes an advertising supplement inserted into and circulated with a newspaper or periodical that is otherwise exempt from tax under this subdivision, if the advertising supplement is delivered directly to the newspaper or periodical by a person other than the advertiser, or the advertising supplement is printed by the newspaper or periodical. (m) Property purchased by persons licensed to operate a commercial radio or television station if the property is used in the origination or integration of the various sources of program material for commercial radio or television transmission. This subdivision does not include a vehicle licensed and titled for use on public highways or property used in the transmitting to or receiving from an artificial satellite. (n) An individual who is a resident of this state who purchases an automobile in another state while in the military service of the United States and who pays a sales tax in the state where the automobile is purchased. (o) A vehicle for which a special registration is secured in accordance with section 226(9) of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.226. (p) The sale of a prosthetic device, durable medical equipment, or mobility enhancing equipment. (q) Water if delivered through water mains, water sold in bulk tanks in quantities of not less than 500 gallons, or the sale of bottled water. (r) A vehicle not for resale used by a nonprofit corporation organized exclusively to provide a community with ambulance or fire department services. (s) Tangible personal property purchased and installed as a component part of a water pollution control facility for which a tax exemption certificate is issued under part 37 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.3701 to 324.3708, or an air pollution control facility for which a tax exemption certificate is issued under part 59 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.5901 to 324.5908. (t) Tangible real or personal property donated by a manufacturer, wholesaler, or retailer to an organization or entity exempt under subdivision (h) or (i) or section 4a(1)(a) or (b) of the general sales tax act, 1933 PA 167, MCL 205.54a. (u) The storage, use, or consumption of an aircraft by a domestic air carrier for use solely in the transport of air cargo, passengers, or a combination of air cargo and passengers, that has a maximum certificated takeoff weight of at least 6,000 pounds. For purposes of this subdivision, the term "domestic air carrier" is limited to a person engaged primarily in the commercial transport for hire of air cargo, passengers, or a combination of air cargo and passengers as a business activity. The state treasurer shall estimate on January 1 each year the revenue lost by this act 2000 PA 200 from the school aid fund established in section 11 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963 and deposit that amount into the state school aid fund from the general fund. (v) The storage, use, or consumption of an aircraft by a person who purchases the aircraft for subsequent lease to a domestic air carrier operating under a certificate issued by the Federal Aviation Administration under 14 CFR part 121, for use solely in the regularly scheduled transport of passengers. (w) Property or services sold to an organization not operated for profit and exempt from federal income tax under section 501(c)(3) or (4) of the internal revenue code of 1986, 26 USC 501; or to a health, welfare, educational, cultural arts, charitable, or benevolent organization not operated for profit that has been issued before June 13, 1994 an exemption ruling letter to purchase items exempt from tax signed by the administrator of the sales, use, and withholding taxes division of the department. The department shall reissue an exemption letter after June 13, 1994 to each of those organizations that had an exemption letter that remains in effect unless the organization fails to meet the requirements that originally entitled it to this exemption. The exemption does not apply to sales of tangible personal property and sales of vehicles licensed for use on public highways, that are not used primarily to carry out the purposes of the organization as stated in the bylaws or articles of incorporation of the exempt organization. (x) The use or consumption of services described in section 3a(1)(a) or (c) or 3b by means of a prepaid telephone calling card, a prepaid authorization number for telephone use, or a charge for internet access. (y) The purchase, lease, use, or consumption of the following by an industrial laundry: (i) Textiles and disposable products including, but not limited to, soap, paper, chemicals, tissues, deodorizers and dispensers, and all related items such as packaging, supplies, hangers, name tags, and identification tags. (ii) Equipment, whether owned or leased, used to repair and dispense textiles including, but not limited to, roll towel cabinets, slings, hardware, lockers, mop handles and frames, and carts. (iii) Machinery, equipment, parts, lubricants, and repair services used to clean, process, and package textiles and related items, whether owned or leased. (iv) Utilities such as electric, gas, water, or oil. (v) Production washroom equipment and mending and packaging supplies and equipment. (vi) Material handling equipment including, but not limited to, conveyors, racks, and elevators and related control equipment. (vii) Wastewater pretreatment equipment and supplies and related maintenance and repair services. (z) Property purchased or manufactured by a person engaged in the business of constructing, altering, repairing, or improving real estate for others, to the extent that the property is affixed to and made a structural part of real estate located in another state, regardless of whether sales or use tax was due and paid in the state in which the property is affixed to real estate. (aa) The sale of a dental prosthesis. (bb) Except as otherwise provided under subsection (3), a sale of any of the following to a person engaged in a business enterprise that uses or consumes the following for purposes as described in subdivision (f): (i) Machinery that is capable of simultaneously harvesting grain or other crops and biomass and machinery used for the purpose of harvesting biomass. (ii) Agricultural land tile and subsurface irrigation pipe. (iii) Portable grain bins, including tangible personal property affixed or to be affixed to portable grain bins and directly used in the operation of a portable grain bin. (iv) Grain drying equipment and the fuel or energy source that powers that equipment, including tangible personal property affixed or to be affixed to that equipment and directly used in the operation of grain drying equipment. (v) Tangible personal property purchased and installed as a component part of a structure such as a barn or shop, including, but not limited to, a water supply system, heating and cooling system, lighting system, milking system, or any other appurtenance used for purposes described in this subdivision or subdivision (f), including the maintenance or improvement of existing structures, to the extent that it is not permanently affixed to and does not become a structural part of real estate. For purposes of this subparagraph and subsection (3), property installed as a component part of a structure as provided in this subparagraph is not permanently affixed to or a structural part of real estate if it is assembled and installed in a manner that it can be disassembled without affecting the physical structural functionality of the original structure and reassembled and reused for any of the purposes described in this subdivision or subdivision (f). (vi) Greenhouses, including tangible personal property affixed to or to be affixed to greenhouses and directly used in the operation of a greenhouse. For purposes of subsection (3), a greenhouse is not permanently affixed to or a structural part of real estate if it is assembled and installed in a manner that it can be disassembled and reassembled without affecting the functionality of the greenhouse upon being reassembled. (cc) The sale of agricultural land tile, subsurface irrigation pipe, portable grain bins, greenhouses, and grain drying equipment to a person in the business of constructing, altering, repairing, or improving real estate for others to the extent that it is affixed to and made a structural part of real estate for others and is used for an exempt purpose described under subdivision (f) or (bb). (dd) The sale of tangible personal property used in the direct gathering of fish, by net, line, or otherwise, by an owner-operator of a business enterprise, not including a charter fishing business enterprise. (ee) A sale of tangible personal property that is specifically designed for, and directly used in, the harvesting of aquatic vegetation from the waters of the state, including parts and materials used for repairs of that tangible personal property, to a person engaged in a business enterprise of harvesting aquatic vegetation and ultimately used for purposes described in subdivision (f) or (bb). This exemption does not include a motor vehicle licensed or required to be licensed for use on the public roads or highways of this state or tangible personal property permanently affixed to and becoming a structural part of real estate. (ff) The purchase or lease of a school bus or transportation-related services, and parts or adaptive equipment affixed or to be affixed to a school bus that are used in the repair, maintenance, accommodation, or modification of a school bus, if the school bus or services are primarily used in the performance of a contract entered into with an authorized representative of a school for the transportation of preprimary, primary, or secondary school pupils to or from a school or school-related events authorized by the administration of the school. However, if the school bus is used to provide transportation-related services other than to or from a school or school-related event authorized by the administration of the school to a nonexempt entity, then the amount paid for those services by the nonexempt entity is not exempt under this subdivision. As used in this subdivision: (i) "Lease" means any transfer of possession or control for a fixed or indeterminate term for consideration and may include future options to purchase or extend. (ii) "School" means a public school or public school academy as defined in section 5 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.5. (iii) "School bus" means that term as defined in section 7 of the pupil transportation act, 1990 PA 187, MCL 257.1807. (gg) The sale of feminine hygiene products. As used in this subdivision, "feminine hygiene products" means tampons, panty liners, menstrual cups, sanitary napkins, and other similar tangible personal property designed for feminine hygiene in connection with the human menstrual cycle. (hh) The purchase of a watercraft for which a 15-day permit is issued under section 80124(3) of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.80124. (ii) To the extent the tax under this act on the purchase of a recreational watercraft exceeds $18,000.00, the purchase of a recreational watercraft. This subdivision does not exempt the purchase of a recreational watercraft from the first $18,000.00 of tax due under this act. This subdivision does not affect the application of, and credit may be received for the agreed-upon value of a titled or documented watercraft used as part payment of the purchase price of a new titled or documented watercraft or used titled or documented watercraft purchased from a watercraft dealer under, section 2(f)(xi). As used in this subdivision: (i) "Application for certificate of number" means the application described in section 80124(1) of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.80124, which is commonly known as an application for a Michigan watercraft registration. (ii) "Documented" means that term as defined in section 2(f)(xi). (iii) "Recreational watercraft" means a watercraft that is used primarily for pleasure or recreation. A watercraft is not considered to be used primarily for pleasure or recreation unless 1 of the following requirements is met: (A) The purchaser files an application for a certificate of number, an application for a certificate of title, or a combined application for a certificate of number and certificate of title for the watercraft under section 80124 or 80307 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.80124 and 324.80307, and the application indicates that the primary use of the watercraft is pleasure. (B) The purchaser files a United States Coast Guard form CG-1258, "Application for Initial, Exchange, or Replacement of Certificate Documentation; Redocumentation", for the watercraft under 46 CFR 67.141 and the application indicates that the primary service of the watercraft is recreational. If a watercraft will be documented through the United States Coast Guard, the application for a certificate of number under section 80124 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.80124, must also indicate that the primary use of the watercraft is pleasure. (C) The purchaser certifies all of the following in the form and manner prescribed by the department: (I) The watercraft will be stored in this state after purchase. (II) On removal from storage in this state, the watercraft will be removed to and registered in another state. (III) The watercraft will be used primarily for pleasure or recreation. (2) The property or services under subsection (1) are exempt only to the extent that the property or services are used for the exempt purposes if one is stated in subsection (1). The exemption is limited to the percentage of exempt use to total use determined by a reasonable formula or method approved by the department. (3) The exemptions under subsection (1)(f), (bb), (cc), and (dd) do not include the transfers of food, fuel, clothing, or any similar tangible personal property for personal living or human consumption or tangible personal property permanently affixed to and becoming a structural part of real estate unless it is agricultural land tile, subsurface irrigation pipe, a portable grain bin, or grain drying equipment. (4) Subsection (1)(f), (bb), and (cc) as amended by 2018 PA 114 is intended to be retroactive and to apply to all periods open under section 27a of 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.27a, but does not apply to any refund claims filed before April 9, 2018. (5) As used in this section: (a) "Agricultural land tile" means fired clay or perforated plastic tubing used as part of a subsurface drainage system for land. (b) "Algae" means any of the group of nonvascular aquatic plants that do not have stems, flowers, leaves, and roots, and that are single-celled, colonial, or filamentous forms. (c) "Aquatic vegetation" means both algae and higher aquatic plants. (d) "Biomass" means crop residue used to produce energy or agricultural crops grown specifically for the production of energy. (e) "Greenhouse" means a structure covered with transparent or translucent materials for the purpose of admitting natural light and controlling the atmosphere for growing horticultural products. Greenhouse does not include a structure primarily used to grow marihuana. (f) "Higher aquatic plant" means any of the group of vascularized plants that have true stems, flowers, leaves, and roots, that live in water, and that belong to the class Angiospermae. (g) "Portable grain bin" means a structure that is used or is to be used to shelter grain and that is designed to be disassembled without significant damage to its component parts. (h) "Watercraft" means that term as defined in section 80301 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.80301, and includes a vessel as that term is defined in section 80104 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.80104. (i) (h) "Waters of the state" means that term as defined in section 3302 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.3302. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.